Utah statutes.
34A-8a-304.   Rehabilitation counselor.
A rehabilitation counselor to whom a referral is made under Section 34A-8a-302
shall have the same or comparable qualifications as those established by the
Utah State Office of Rehabilitation for personnel assigned to rehabilitation
and evaluation duties.
